California statutes. Labor Code
(e) The Labor Commissioner or the Attorney General may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction against the employer or other person violating this article and, upon prevailing, shall be entitled to collect legal or equitable relief on behalf of the aggrieved as may be appropriate to remedy the violation, including reinstatement, backpay, the payment of sick days unlawfully withheld, the payment of an additional sum, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of four thousand dollars ($4,000), as liquidated damages in the amount of fifty dollars
 ($50) to each employee or person whose rights under this article were violated for each day or portion thereof that the violation occurred or continued, plus, if the employer has unlawfully withheld paid sick days to an employee, the dollar amount of paid sick days withheld from the employee multiplied by three; or two hundred fifty dollars ($250), whichever amount is greater; and reinstatement in employment or injunctive relief; and further shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, provided, however, that any person or entity enforcing this article on behalf of the public as provided for under applicable state law shall, upon prevailing, be entitled only to equitable, injunctive, or restitutionary relief, and reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(f) In an administrative or civil action brought under this article, the Labor Commissioner or court, as the case may be, shall award interest on all amounts due and unpaid at the rate of
 interest specified in subdivision (b) of Section 3289 of the Civil Code.

(g) The remedies, penalties, and procedures provided under this article are cumulative.

(h) An employer shall not be assessed any penalty or liquidated damages under this article due to an isolated and unintentional payroll error or written notice error that is a clerical or an inadvertent mistake regarding the accrual or available use of paid sick leave. In reviewing for compliance with this section, the factfinder may consider as a relevant factor whether the employer, prior to an alleged violation, has adopted and is in compliance with a set of policies, procedures, and practices that fully comply with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 45, Sec. 5.   (AB 1867)   Effective September 9, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

248.6.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Covered employee” means an employee who is unable to work or telework for an employer because of a reason listed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(2) “COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave” means supplemental paid sick leave provided pursuant to this section.

(3) “Employer” means an employer, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 245.5, that employs more than 25 employees.

(4) “Family member” has the same meaning as in subdivision (c) of Section 245.5.

(5) “Firefighter” means an active firefighting member of any of the following:

(A) A fire department of a city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision.

(B) A fire department of the University of California and the California State University.

(C) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(D) A county forestry or firefighting department or unit.

(E) A fire department that serves a United States Department of Defense installation and whose firefighters are certified by the United States Department of Defense as meeting its standards for firefighters.

(F) A fire department that serves a National Aeronautics and Space Administration installation and that adheres to training standards established in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 13155) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.

(G) A fire department that provides fire protection to a commercial airport regulated by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) under Part 139 (commencing with Section 139.1) of Subchapter G of Chapter 1 of Title 14 of the Federal Code of Regulations whose firefighters are trained and certified by the State Fire Marshal as meeting the standards of Fire Control 5 and Section 139.319 of Title 14 of the Federal Code of Regulations.

(H) Fire and rescue services coordinators who work for the Office of Emergency Services. For purposes of this clause, “fire and rescue services coordinators” means
 coordinators with any of the following job classifications: coordinator, senior coordinator, or chief coordinator.

(b) A covered employee shall be entitled to COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as follows:

(1) An employer shall provide COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to each covered employee if that covered employee is unable to work or telework due to any of the following reasons:

(A) The covered employee is subject to a quarantine or isolation period related to COVID-19 as defined by an order or guidance of the State Department of Public Health, the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or a local public health officer who has jurisdiction over the workplace. If the covered employee is subject to more than one of the foregoing, the covered employee shall be permitted to use COVID-19
 supplemental paid sick leave for the minimum quarantine or isolation period under the order or guidance that provides for the longest such minimum period.

(B) The covered employee has been advised by a health care provider to isolate or quarantine due to COVID-19.

(C) The covered employee is attending an appointment for themselves or a family member to receive a vaccine or a vaccine booster for protection against COVID-19, subject to the limitation in clause (ii) of subparagraph (D).

(D) (i) The covered employee is experiencing symptoms, or caring for a family member experiencing symptoms, related to a COVID-19 vaccine or vaccine booster that prevent the employee from being able to work or telework.

(ii) For each vaccination or
 vaccine booster, an employer may limit the total COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to 3 days or 24 hours unless the employee provides verification from a health care provider that the covered employee or their family member is continuing to experience symptoms related to a COVID-19 vaccine or vaccine booster. The 3-day or 24-hour limitation applied to each vaccine or vaccine booster includes the time used under subparagraph (C) to get the vaccine or vaccine booster.

(E) The covered employee is experiencing symptoms of COVID-19 and seeking a medical diagnosis.

(F) The covered employee is caring for a family member who is subject to an order or guidance described in subparagraph (A) or who has been advised to isolate or quarantine, as described in subparagraph (B).

(G) The covered employee is caring for a child, as
 defined in subdivision (c) of Section 245.5, whose school or place of care is closed or otherwise unavailable for reasons related to COVID-19 on the premises.

(2) A covered employee shall be entitled to the following number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave:

(A) A covered employee is entitled to 40 hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave, if the covered employee satisfies either of the following criteria:

(i) The employer considers the covered employee to work full time.

(ii) The covered employee worked or was scheduled to work, on average, at least 40 hours per week for the employer in the two weeks preceding the date the covered employee took COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a covered employee who is a firefighter who was scheduled to work more than 40 hours for the employer in the one workweek preceding the date the covered employee took COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave is entitled to an amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave equal to the total number of hours that the covered employee was scheduled to work for the employer in that workweek.

(C) A covered employee who does not satisfy the criteria in subparagraph (A) or subparagraph (B) is entitled to an amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as follows:

(i) If the covered employee has a normal weekly schedule, the total number of hours the covered employee is normally scheduled to work for the employer over one week.

(ii) If the covered employee works a variable number of hours, seven times the average number of hours the covered employee worked each day for the employer in the six months preceding the date the covered employee took COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave. If the covered employee has worked for the employer over a period of fewer than six months but more than seven days, this calculation shall instead be made over the entire period the covered employee has worked for the employer.

(iii) If the covered employee works a variable number of hours and has worked for the employer over a period of seven days or fewer, the total number of hours the covered employee has worked for that employer.

(D) (i) A covered employee is entitled to additional COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave in an amount not to exceed that which the covered employee was
 entitled to under subparagraph (A), (B), or (C), as applicable, if the covered employee, or a family member for whom the covered employee is providing care, tests positive for COVID-19.

(ii) If the employee tested positive as described in clause (i), an employer may require the employee to submit to a diagnostic test on or after the fifth day after the test described in clause (i) was taken and provide documentation of those results. If the diagnostic test is positive, the employer may also require the employee to submit to a second diagnostic test within no less than 24 hours. The employer shall make such tests available at no cost to the employee.

(iii) If the employee requests to use additional leave pursuant to this subparagraph because a family member for whom they are providing care tests positive for COVID-19, the employer may require that the employee provide documentation of that family member’s test results before paying the additional leave.

(iv) The employer has no obligation to provide additional COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave under this subparagraph for an employee who refuses to provide documentation of the results of the test described in clause (i) upon the request of the employer or who refuses to submit to the tests described in clause (ii).

(v) The employee does not need to exhaust the leave to which they are entitled under subparagraph (A), (B), or (C), before using the additional leave provided for in this subparagraph.

(vi) This section shall not limit an employer’s duties to comply with the Cal-OSHA COVID-19 Emergency Temporary Standards, including, but not limited to, Sections 3205 to 3205.4, inclusive, of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations or the Cal-OSHA Aerosol Transmissible Diseases Standard at Section 5199 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(E) The total maximum amount of
 COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave a covered employee is entitled to pursuant to this section shall not exceed 80 hours for the period between January 1, 2022, and December 31, 2022. This subparagraph does not apply to employees subject to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of this subdivision.

(F) The total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which a covered employee is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), or (C), and the total number of hours of additional COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which a covered employee is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (D), shall be in addition to any paid sick leave that may be available to the covered employee under Section 246.

(G) A covered employee may determine how many hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to use, up to the total number of hours to which the covered employee is
 entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D). The employer shall make COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave available for immediate use by the covered employee, upon the oral or written request of the covered employee to the employer.

(H) An employer is not required to provide a covered employee more than the total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the covered employee is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), or (C), or more than the total number of hours of additional COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the covered employee is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (D).

(3) (A) Each hour of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave shall be compensated at a rate equal to the following:

(i) For nonexempt covered employees, by one of the
 following:

(I) Calculated in the same manner as the regular rate of pay for the workweek in which the employee uses paid sick time, whether or not the employee actually works overtime in that workweek.

(II) Calculated by dividing the employee’s total wages, not including overtime premium pay, by the employee’s total nonovertime hours worked in the full pay periods occurring within the prior 90 days of employment; provided that, for nonexempt employees paid by piece rate, commission or other method that uses all hours to determine the regular rate of pay, total wages, not including overtime premium pay, shall be divided by all hours, to determine the correct amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave under this subdivision.

(ii) COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave for exempt employees shall be calculated in the
 same manner as the employer calculates wages for other forms of paid leave time.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a covered employee who is entitled to an amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), shall be compensated for each hour of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave at the regular rate of pay to which the covered employee would be entitled as if the covered employee had been scheduled to work those hours, pursuant to existing law or an applicable collective bargaining agreement.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) or (B), an employer shall not be required to pay more than five hundred eleven dollars ($511) per day and five thousand one hundred ten dollars ($5,110) in the aggregate to a covered employee for COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave taken by the covered employee unless federal legislation is enacted that
 increases these amounts beyond the amounts that were included in the Emergency Paid Sick Leave Act established by the federal Families First Coronavirus Response Act (Public Law 116-127), in which case the new federal dollar amounts shall apply to this section as of the date the new amounts are applicable under the federal law. Nothing in this subparagraph shall prevent a covered employee who has reached the maximum amounts, as set forth herein, from choosing to utilize other paid leave that is available to the covered employee in order to fully compensate the covered employee for leave taken.

(4) An employer shall not require a covered employee to use any other paid or unpaid leave, paid time off, or vacation time provided by the employer to the covered employee before the covered employee uses COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave or in lieu of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave.

(5) An employer shall not require a covered employee to first exhaust their COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave under this section before satisfying any requirement to provide paid leave for reasons related to COVID-19 under any Cal-OSHA COVID-19 Emergency Temporary Standards, including, but not limited to, Sections 3205 to 3205.4, inclusive, of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations or the Cal-OSHA Aerosol Transmissible Diseases Standard at Section 5199 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if an employer pays a covered employee another supplemental benefit for leave taken on or after January 1, 2022, that is payable for the reasons listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) and that compensates the covered employee in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of compensation for COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the covered employee is entitled as set
 forth under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), then the employer may count the hours of the other paid benefit or leave towards the total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave that the employer is required to provide to the covered employee under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). For purposes of the foregoing, the other supplemental benefit for leave taken that may be counted does not include paid sick leave to which the covered employee is entitled under Section 246, subdivision (e) of Section 248, subdivision (f) of Section 248.1, or subdivision (f) of Section 248.2 but may include paid leave provided by the employer pursuant to any federal or local law in effect or that became effective on or after January 1, 2022, if the paid leave is provided to the covered employee under that law for any of the same reasons set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(d) In addition to other remedies as may be provided by the laws of
 this state or its subdivisions, including, but not limited to, the remedies available to redress any unlawful business practice under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code, the Labor Commissioner shall enforce this section. For purposes of enforcement and to implement COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave, this section shall apply as follows:

(1) The Labor Commissioner shall enforce this section as if COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave constitutes “paid sick days,” “paid sick leave,” or “sick leave” under subdivisions (i) and (n) of Section 246, subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 246.5, Section 247, Section 247.5, and Section 248.5.

(2) For purposes of the enforcement of subdivision (i) of Section 246 as it relates to this section, COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave shall be set forth separately from paid sick
 days. The employer shall provide an employee with written notice that sets forth the amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave that the employee has used through the pay period in which it was due to be paid on either the employee’s itemized wage statement described in Section 226 or in a separate writing provided on the designated pay date with the employee’s payment of wages. The employer shall list zero hours used if a worker has not used any COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave. This requirement is not enforceable until the next full pay period following the date that this section takes effect.

(3) Section 249 applies to COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave.

(4) By seven days after the date of enactment of this section, the Labor Commissioner shall make publicly available a model notice for purposes of Section 247. Only for purposes of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick
 leave, if an employer’s covered employees do not frequent a workplace, the employer may satisfy the notice requirement of subdivision (a) of Section 247 by disseminating notice through electronic means, such as by electronic mail.

(e) (1) The requirement to provide COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as set forth in this section shall take effect 10 days after the date of enactment of this section, at which time the requirements shall apply retroactively to January 1, 2022.

(2) The requirement to provide COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as set forth in this section applies retroactively to January 1, 2022, in order to protect the economic well-being of covered employees who took leave for the reasons listed in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) beginning on or after January 1, 2022, as all the requirements in Sections 248, 248.1, 248.2, and 248.3,
 and the Emergency Paid Sick Leave Act established by the federal Families First Coronavirus Response Act (Public Law 116-127) expired before the effective date of this section. An employer may require a covered employee to provide documentation of a positive COVID-19 diagnostic test during the relevant period if an employee requests retroactive payment of the COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave described in clause (i) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(A) (i) For any such leave taken, if the employer did not compensate the covered employee in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of compensation for COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the covered employee is entitled as set forth under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), then upon the oral or written request of the employee, the employer shall provide the covered employee with a retroactive payment that provides for such
 compensation.

(ii) For any such leave taken, if the employer did compensate the covered employee in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of compensation for COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the covered employee is entitled as set forth under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), then upon the oral or written request of the employee, such employee should be credited for any leave hours used for COVID-specific leave purposes, and the employer should be credited for providing those hours as COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave.

(B) For any such retroactive payment, the number of hours of leave corresponding to the amount of the retroactive payment shall count towards the total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave that the employer is required to provide to the covered employee under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(C) This retroactive payment shall be paid on or before the payday for the next full pay period after the oral or written request of the covered employee. The retroactive payment shall be reflected on the written notice required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) for the corresponding pay period.

(D) The requirement to provide a retroactive payment under this subdivision is in addition to the requirement in subdivision (f) of Section 248.2 that a covered employee taking COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave at the time of the expiration of those sections shall be permitted to take the full amount of such supplemental paid sick leave to which that covered employee otherwise would have been entitled under those sections.

(f) The requirement to provide COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as set forth in this section
 shall remain in effect through December 31, 2022, except that a covered employee taking COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave at the time of the expiration of this section shall be permitted to take the full amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the covered employee otherwise would have been entitled under this section.

(g) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(h) The provisions of this section shall not apply to providers of in-home supportive services under Section 14132.95, 14132.952, or 14132.956 of, or
 Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, or waiver personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   (AB 152)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

248.7.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave” means supplemental paid sick leave provided pursuant to this section.

(2) “Family member” has the same meaning as in subdivision (c) of Section 245.5.

(3) “Provider” or “providers” means a provider of in-home supportive services under Section 14132.95, 14132.952, or 14132.956 of, or Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, or waiver personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(4) “Work” or “worked” means providing authorized in-home supportive services under Section 14132.95, 14132.952, or 14132.956 of, or Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, or waiver personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to an eligible recipient.

(b) A provider shall be entitled to COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as follows:

(1) COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave shall be available to a provider if that provider is unable to work due to any of the following reasons:

(A) The provider is subject to a quarantine or isolation period related to COVID-19 as defined by an order or guidance of the State Department of Public Health, the federal Centers for Disease Control and
 Prevention, or a local public health officer who has jurisdiction over the workplace. If the provider is subject to more than one of the foregoing, the provider shall be permitted to use COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave for the minimum quarantine or isolation period under the order or guidance that provides for the longest minimum period.

(B) The provider has been advised by a health care provider to isolate or quarantine due to COVID-19.

(C) The provider is attending an appointment for themselves or a family member to receive a vaccine or vaccine booster for protection against COVID-19, subject to the limitation in clause (ii) of subparagraph (D).

(D) (i) The provider is experiencing symptoms, or caring for a family member experiencing symptoms, related to a COVID-19 vaccine or vaccine
 booster that prevents the provider from being able to work.

(ii) For each vaccination or vaccine booster, the provider is limited in total COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to 3 days or 24 hours unless the provider provides verification from a health care provider that the provider or their family member is continuing to experience symptoms related to a COVID-19 vaccine or vaccine booster. The three days or 24 hour limitation applied to each vaccine or vaccine booster includes the time used under subparagraph (C) to get the vaccine or vaccine booster.

(E) The provider is experiencing symptoms of COVID-19 and seeking a medical diagnosis.

(F) The provider is caring for a family member who is subject to an order or guidance described in subparagraph (A) or who has been advised to isolate or quarantine, as described
 in subparagraph (B).

(G) The provider is caring for a child, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 245.5, whose school or place of care is closed or otherwise unavailable for reasons related to COVID-19 on the premises.

(2) A provider shall be entitled to the following number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave:

(A) A provider is entitled to 40 hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave if the provider worked or was scheduled to work, on average, at least 40 hours per week in the two weeks preceding the date the provider took COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave.

(B) A provider who does not satisfy the criteria in subparagraph (A) is entitled to an amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as follows, up to a maximum of 40
 hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave:

(i) If the provider has a regular weekly schedule, the total number of hours the provider is normally scheduled to work over one week.

(ii) If the provider works a variable number of hours, seven times the average number of hours the provider worked each day for the employer in the six months preceding the date the provider took COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave. If the provider has worked over a period of fewer than six months but more than seven days, this calculation shall instead be made over the entire period the provider has worked.

(iii) If the provider works a variable number of hours and has worked over a period of seven days or fewer, the total number of hours the provider has worked.

(C) The
 total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which a provider is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) shall be determined on the first day that the provider uses COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave under this section.

(D) A provider is entitled to additional COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave in an amount not to exceed that which the provider was entitled to under subparagraph (A) or (B), if the provider, or a family member for whom the provider is providing care, tests positive for COVID-19 via a diagnostic test.

(E) A provider may determine how many hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to use, up to the total number of hours to which the provider is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), or (D). The COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave is available for immediate use by the provider, and the provider shall inform the recipient of
 the need to take sick leave and submit a sick leave claim to the county consistent with established procedures in that county. The COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave shall be in addition to any paid sick leave that may be available to the provider under Section 246.

(F) The total maximum amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave a provider is entitled to pursuant to this section shall not exceed 80 hours for the period between January 1, 2022, and December 31, 2022.

(3) Each hour of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave shall be compensated at the regular rate of pay to which the provider would be entitled if the provider had been scheduled to work those hours pursuant to existing law or an applicable collective bargaining agreement.

(4) A provider shall not be required to use any other paid or unpaid leave before the provider uses COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave or in lieu of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if a provider takes paid leave on or after January 1, 2022, that is payable for the reasons listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (b) that compensates the provider in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of compensation for COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the provider is entitled as set forth under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the hours of the other paid benefit or leave may be counted towards the total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the provider is entitled under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). For purposes of the foregoing, the other supplemental benefit for leave taken that may be counted does not include paid sick leave to which the provider may be entitled to under Section 246, but may include paid leave provided by any federal or local law that becomes effective on or after January 1, 2022, if the paid leave is provided to the provider under that law for any of the same reasons set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(d) (1) The entitlement to COVID-19 supplemental paid
 sick leave as set forth in this section shall take effect 10 days after the date of enactment of this section, at which time the entitlements shall apply retroactively to January 1, 2022.

(2) The entitlement to COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as set forth in this section applies retroactively to January 1, 2022.

(A) For any such leave taken, if the provider was not compensated in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of compensation for COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the provider is entitled as set forth under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), then the provider shall be entitled to a retroactive payment that provides for such compensation.

(B) For any such retroactive payment, the number of hours of leave corresponding to the amount of the retroactive payment shall count towards the
 total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave that the provider is entitled to under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(e) The entitlement to COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as set forth in this section shall remain in effect through December 31, 2022, except that a provider taking COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave at the time of the expiration of this section shall be permitted to take the full amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the provider otherwise would have been entitled under this section.

(f) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(g) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of
 the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 736, Sec. 3.   (AB 152)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

249.

(a) This article does not limit or affect any laws guaranteeing the privacy of health information, or information related to domestic violence or sexual assault, regarding an employee or employee’s family member. That information shall be treated as confidential and shall not be disclosed to any person except to the affected employee, or as required by law.

(b) This article shall not be construed to discourage or prohibit an employer from the adoption or retention of a paid sick days policy more generous than the one required herein.

(c) This article does not lessen the obligation of an employer to comply
 with a contract, collective bargaining agreement, employment benefit plan, or other agreement providing more generous sick days to an employee than required herein.

(d) This article establishes minimum requirements pertaining to paid sick days and does not preempt, limit, or otherwise affect the applicability of any other law, regulation, requirement, policy, or standard that provides for greater accrual or use by employees of sick days, whether paid or unpaid, or that extends other protections to an employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 317, Sec. 3.   (AB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Seasonal Labor [250. - 257.]

250.

As used in this article “seasonal labor” means all labor performed by any person hired in this State to perform services outside of this State for a period greater than one month, where the wages are to be paid in this State, not at fixed intervals, but at the termination of such employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

251.

This article shall not apply to wages earned by seamen or other persons, where payment is regulated by Federal statute.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

252.

Upon application of either the employer or the employee, the wages earned in seasonal labor shall be paid in the presence of the Labor Commissioner, or his deputy or agent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

253.

The Labor Commissioner shall hear and decide all wage disputes arising in connection with seasonal labor and shall allow or reject any deductions made from such wages. He shall reject all deductions made for gambling and liquor debts incurred by the employee during such employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

254.

After a final hearing by the Labor Commissioner, he shall file in the office of his division a copy of the findings of fact and his award.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

255.

The amount of the award of the Labor Commissioner shall, in the absence of fraud, be conclusively presumed to be the amount of the wages due and unpaid to the employee at the time of the termination of the employment but shall be subject to review by the courts in the manner provided by the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

256.

The Labor Commissioner shall impose a civil penalty in an amount not exceeding 30 days pay as waiting time under the terms of Section 203.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1096, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

257.

All provisions of Article 1 of this chapter, except sections 204, 205, 207, 208, 209, 210, 211 and 215 are applicable to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Special Occupations [270. - 273.]

270.

No person, or agent or officer thereof, engaged in the business of extracting or of extracting and refining or reducing minerals other than petroleum, except persons having a free and unencumbered title to the fee of the property being worked and except mining partnerships in respect to the members of the partnership, shall fail or neglect, before commencing work in any period for which a single payment of wages is made, to have on hand or on deposit with a bank or trust company, in the county where such property is located or if there is no bank or trust company in the county, then in the bank or trust company nearest the property, cash or readily salable securities of a market value sufficient to pay the wages of every person employed on the mining property, or in connection therewith, for such period.

Any person, or agent or officer thereof, who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 628.)
-------------------------------------------

270.5.

(a) No person, agent or officer thereof, or logging contractor, or sawmill operations contractor, engaged in the business of logging or operating a sawmill for converting logs into lumber, except in the case of logging or sawmill operations of persons having a free and unencumbered title to the fee of real property in this state, of a market value sufficient to pay the wages of every person employed in connection with such operations in any period for which a single payment of wages is made, shall fail or neglect, before commencing work in any period for which such single payment of wages is made, or for four calendar weeks, whichever is the longer, to do one of the following:

(1) Have on hand or on deposit with a bank or trust company, in the county where such business is conducted, or if there is no bank or trust company in the county, then in the bank or trust company nearest such operations, cash or readily salable securities of a market value sufficient to pay the wages of every person employed in connection with such operations for such period.

(2) Deposit with the Labor Commissioner the bond of a surety company authorized to do business within the state, acceptable to the Labor Commissioner, conditioned upon the payment of all wages found by the Labor Commissioner to be due and unpaid in connection with such operations.

(b) The cash and securities on deposit referred to in subdivision (a) shall not be commingled with other deposits, securities or property of the employer and shall be held in trust and shall not be used for any other purpose than paying the wages due employees. Such moneys so held in trust are not subject to the enforcement of a money judgment by any other creditor of the employer.

(c) Any person, agent or officer thereof, or logging contractor, or sawmill operations contractor, who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
